Washington statutes.
RCW 17.26.020

High priority for all state agencies—Definitions.

(1) Facilitating the control of spartina and purple loosestrife is a high priority for all state agencies.

(2) The department of natural resources is responsible for spartina and purple loosestrife control on state-owned aquatic lands managed by the department of natural resources.

(3) The department of fish and wildlife is responsible for spartina and purple loosestrife control on state-owned aquatic lands managed by the department of fish and wildlife.

(4) The state parks and recreation commission is responsible for spartina and purple loosestrife control on state-owned aquatic lands managed by the state parks and recreation commission.

(5) Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this subsection apply throughout this chapter, RCW 90.48.020, 90.58.030, and 77.55.081:

(a) "Spartina" means Spartina alterniflora, Spartina anglica, Spartina x townsendii, and Spartina patens.

(b) "Purple loosestrife" means Lythrum salicaria and Lythrum virgatum.

(c) "Aquatic noxious weed" means an aquatic weed on the state noxious weed list adopted under RCW 17.10.080.

[ 2011 c 103 s 13; 2003 c 39 s 10; 1995 c 255 s 12.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.